North Carolina, session 2025, SB282.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Health
Benefits (DHB), shall develop and, to the extent allowed under G.S. 108A-54.1A, implement a
plan for a statewide reimbursement methodology for behavioral health services provided to adult
Medicaid beneficiaries with severe and persistent mental illness who are served by a clubhouse
model psychosocial rehabilitation day program. The plan shall include all of the following:
(1) Incentives for clubhouses to become accredited by Clubhouse International.
(2) Consistent application of rates throughout regions served by local
management entities/managed care organizations (LME/MCOs).
(3) Education and training for LME/MCO staff and relevant staff within the
Department of Health and Human Services on the clubhouse model and its
use in serving individuals with severe and persistent mental illness in this
State.
SECTION 1.(b) No later than December 1, 2025, DHB shall submit a report to the
Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Medicaid that contains all of the following information
related to the plan required by subsection (a) of this section:
(1) The proposed reimbursement methodology.
(2) A proposed time line for implementation for the reimbursement methodology.
(3) Any costs associated with implementation of the reimbursement
methodology.
(4) Details on the education and training developed for LME/MCOs and staff of
the Department of Health and Human Services.
SECTION 2. Effective July 1, 2025, there is appropriated from the General Fund to
the North Carolina Clubhouse Coalition, Inc., a nonprofit corporation, the sum of two million
five hundred thousand dollars ($2,500,000) in recurring funds for each year of the 2025-2027
fiscal biennium to be used to provide funding for member clubhouses for current programs,
expansion of services or locations served, accreditation of a clubhouse, or staff training and
professional development.
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*S282-v-1*